Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.080

Criminal complaint—Authority to suspend officer—Hearing.

When the complaint served upon an officer is of a criminal nature calling for the discharge of the officer, the chief of the patrol may immediately suspend the officer without pay pending a trial board hearing. The board shall be convened no later than forty-five days from the date of suspension. However, this does not preclude the granting of a mutually agreed upon extension; in such cases the officer shall remain on suspension without pay.

An officer complained of may waive a hearing and accept the proposed discipline by written notice to the chief of the patrol.

[ 1989 c 28 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.080. Prior: 1943 c 205 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6362-69.]